North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-04 Other Officials of Supreme Court

27-04-01.
Supreme court reporter — Appointment, qualifications, term, titles. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 56, § 2; N.D. Const., § 93; R.C. 1895, § 389; R.C. 1899, § 389; R.C. 1905, § 455; C.L. 1913, § 731; S.L. 1919, ch. 211, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 737a1; R.C. 1943, § 27-0401; repealed by 2019, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

27-04-02.
Bond of supreme court reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 24.

27-04-03.
Salary of supreme court reporter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 171, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 395; S.L. 1897, ch. 138, § 1; 1899, ch. 154, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 395; R.C. 1905, § 461; C.L. 1913, § 737; S.L. 1919, ch. 211, § 8; 1923, ch. 195, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 737a8; R.C. 1943, § 27-0403; S.L. 1981, ch. 535, § 9; repealed by 2019, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

27-04-04.
Location of office of supreme court reporter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 211, § 8; 1923, ch. 195, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 737a8; R.C. 1943, § 27-0404; repealed by 2019, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

27-04-05.
Opinions and reports of supreme court printed and published by reporter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 277, § 2.

27-04-06.
Reporter’s duties as to state law library. [Repealed]

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 1034; R.C. 1899, § 1034; R.C. 1905, § 1295; S.L. 1911, ch. 284, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1843; S.L. 1919, ch. 211, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 737a4; R.C. 1943, § 27-0406; repealed by 2019, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

27-04-07.
Reporter’s duties as legislative reference librarian. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 211, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 737a5; R.C. 1943, § 27-0407; repealed by 2019, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

27-04-08.
Sale and disposal of books and other library materials by supreme court reporter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 211, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 737a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 126, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 27-0408; S.L. 1969, ch. 277, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

27-04-08.1.
Secretary of state to purchase certain property and publication rights. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

27-04-09.
Court security.

The state highway patrol and other law enforcement agencies, at the request of the chief justice, shall provide security services to the supreme court when the court considers those services to be necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 90, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 396, 397; R.C. 1899, §§ 396, 397; R.C. 1905, §§ 462, 463; C.L. 1913, §§ 738, 739; R.C. 1943, § 27-0409; S.L. 1983, ch. 347, § 1.

27-04-10.
Sheriff acting as marshal liable on official bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 347, § 2.

27-04-11.
Appointment and duties of bailiff of supreme court — Compensation of bailiff.

The judges of the supreme court may designate the supreme court reporter, or any other person, to act as bailiff of such court and may prescribe the duties of such bailiff. The supreme court reporter, if designated to act as bailiff, shall receive no additional compensation therefor, but any other person so designated may be allowed by such court such compensation for that person’s services as may be reasonable.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 286, §§ 1, 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 741, 742; R.C. 1943, § 27-0411.